Georgia, session 2025_26, SB255.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Chapter 1 of Title 28 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to general
provisions regarding the General Assembly, is amended by adding a new Code section to
read as follows:
"28-1-17.
(a) The Senate or the House of Representatives may, through rules of procedure or
resolution, authorize one or more committees of such chamber to exercise the investigatory
S. B. 255
- 1 -

LC 47 3461
powers provided for in Code Section 45-15-19. The Senate and the House of
Representatives may, through joint resolution or rules of procedure, authorize one or more
joint committees to exercise the investigatory powers provided for in Code
Section 45-15-9.
(b) For the purpose of conducting any investigation, a committee that has been authorized
to exercise investigatory powers pursuant to subsection (a) of this Code section shall have
the power to administer oaths; to call any party to testify under oath at such investigation;
to require the attendance of witnesses and the production of books, records, and papers; and
to take the depositions of witnesses. For such purposes, the committee is authorized to
issue a subpoena for any witness or a subpoena to compel the production of any books,
records, or papers consistent with the rules of procedure or resolution enabling such
committee. A subpoena issued under this Code section may be served at any place in this
state and in any manner authorized in Code Section 24-13-24.
(c) In case of refusal to obey a subpoena issued under this Code section to any person and
upon application by the committee that has been authorized to exercise investigatory
powers pursuant to subsection (a) of this Code section, the superior court in whose
jurisdiction the witness is to appear or in which the books, records, or papers are to be
produced may issue to that person an order requiring him or her to appear before the court
to show cause why he or she should not be held in contempt for refusal to obey the
subpoena. Failure to obey a subpoena may be punished by the court as contempt of court.
(d) When authorized by the rules of procedure or resolution enabling such committee, the
confidential treatment of material and information in the course of investigations and other
proceedings of such committee shall be recognized by law. Such confidential treatment
shall be preserved in proceedings under this Code section as provided in this subsection.
If the application for a subpoena requests confidential treatment, the court shall take any
and all steps necessary or appropriate to preserve the confidentiality of the application. The
court may, but shall not be required to, issue the subpoena in such a manner as to preserve
S. B. 255
- 2 -

LC 47 3461
its confidentiality. If the court determines that a subpoena may be issued but confidential
treatment is not warranted under the rules of procedure or resolution enabling such
committee, the judge shall so notify the chairperson or acting chairperson; and the
chairperson or acting chairperson shall then have the option to:
(1) Abandon the request for a subpoena, in which case the application shall remain
confidential; or
(2) Accept the determination of the court, in which case the subpoena shall issue, but the
application and the issuance shall not be treated as confidential.
(e) Nothing in this Code section, Code Section 28-1-16, Code Section 45-15-17, or Code
Section 45-15-19, or in any other section of this Code, is intended to, or shall be interpreted
as, abrogating, modifying, superseding, or in any other way limiting any authority,
immunity, privilege, or power granted to or possessed by the General Assembly, the
Senate, the House of Representatives, any committee of either chamber, any joint
committee, and the members thereof, whether explicitly or implicitly, by the Constitution,
the rules of procedure of either chamber, statutory law, decisional law, or common law and
the General Assembly expressly intends to preserve all such authority, immunity, privilege,
and power. Nor is this Code section in any way intended to, or shall be interpreted as,
abrogating, modifying, superseding, or in any limiting any investigations by, or powers of,
any committees of the Senate or the House of Representatives that were authorized, or to
any subpoenas issued by or other actions taken by any such committee, prior to the
effective date of this Code section."
SECTION 2.
This Act shall become effective upon its approval by the Governor or upon its becoming law
without such approval.
S. B. 255
- 3 -

LC 47 3461
SECTION 3.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
S. B. 255
- 4 -